Washington statutes.
RCW 36.69.070

Elections—Procedures—Terms.

A ballot proposition authorizing the formation of the proposed park and recreation district shall be submitted to the voters of the proposed district for their approval or rejection at the next general state election occurring sixty or more days after the county legislative authority fixes the boundaries of the proposed district. Notices of the election for the formation of the park and recreation district shall state generally and briefly the purpose thereof and shall give the boundaries of the proposed district and name the day of the election and the hours during which the polls will be open. The proposition to be submitted to the voters shall be stated in such manner that the voters may indicate yes or no upon the proposition of forming the proposed park and recreation district.

The initial park and recreation commissioners shall be elected at the same election, but this election shall be null and void if the district is not authorized to be formed. No primary shall be held to nominate candidates for the initial commissioner positions. Candidates shall run for specific commission positions. A special filing period shall be opened as provided in RCW 29A.24.171 and 29A.24.181. The person who receives the greatest number of votes for each commission position shall be elected to that position. The three persons who are elected receiving the greatest number of votes shall be elected to four-year terms of office if the election is held in an odd-numbered year or three-year terms of office if the election is held in an even-numbered year. The other two persons who are elected shall be elected to two-year terms of office if the election is held in an odd-numbered year or one-year terms of office if the election is held in an even-numbered year. The initial commissioners shall take office immediately upon being elected and qualified, but the length of such terms shall be computed from the first day of January in the year following this election.

[ 2015 c 53 s 66; 1994 c 223 s 43; 1979 ex.s. c 126 s 28; 1963 c 4 s 36.69.070. Prior: 1959 c 304 s 4; 1957 c 58 s 7.]

NOTES:

Purpose—1979 ex.s. c 126: See RCW 29A.60.280(1).